New York, session 2025-2026, S100.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 100 of the alcoholic beverage control law is 2 amended by adding a new subdivision 6-a to read as follows: 3 6-a. Notwithstanding subdivision five of this section, a retail licen- 4 see for off-premises consumption may sell, deliver, give away, hold or 5 store, or cause, permit or procure to be sold, delivered, given away, 6 held or stored, any alcoholic beverage on credit to any individual 7 person, provided that the order on credit is at least two hundred 8 dollars. The provision of this subdivision shall still apply if the 9 retail licensee retains the alcoholic beverage for the individual 10 person. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00746-01-5